Louisiana, session 2026, HB1146.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The Legislature of Louisiana finds that the state's early childhood care and
education system has benefitted from both the Advisory Council on Early Childhood Care
and Education and the Early Childhood Care and Education Commission and that greater
alignment, efficiency, and impact can be achieved by consolidating these entities while
preserving their duties, membership, and authority.
Section 2. R.S. 17:407.101(C), (E), (F), and (G) are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 17:407.101(I) through (M) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1146 ENROLLED
§407.101. Early Childhood Care and Education Commission
* * *
C.(1) The commission is composed of forty-five members as follows:
(a) One representative of a municipality that receives Head Start funding,
appointed by the governor.
(b) (a) One representative of a Head Start program, appointed by the
governor.
(c) (b) One representative of a child advocacy or community organization,
appointed by the governor.
(d) (c) One representative of a disability advocacy organization, appointed
by the governor.
(e) (d) One representative of the governor's office, appointed by the
governor.
(f) (e) One business representative, appointed by the speaker of the House of
Representatives.
(g) (f) One local school superintendent, appointed by the speaker of the
House of Representatives.
(h) (g) One representative of Type III early learning centers, appointed by the
speaker of the House of Representatives.
(i) (h) One representative of a child advocacy or community organization,
appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives For Providers, By
Providers.
(j) (i) One parent of a child in a publicly funded child daycare early learning
center, Early Head Start Center, Head Start Center, or stand-alone prekindergarten
program, appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives.
(k) (j) Two members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the
speaker of the House of Representatives.
(l) (k) One business representative, appointed by the president of the Senate.
(m) (l) One local school superintendent, appointed by the president of the
Senate.
Page 2 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1146 ENROLLED
(n) (m) One representative of Type III early learning centers, appointed by
the president of the Senate.
(o) One representative of a child advocacy or community organization,
appointed by the president of the Senate.
(p) (n) One parent of a child in a publicly funded child daycare early learning
center, Early Head Start Center, Head Start Center, or stand-alone prekindergarten
program, appointed by the president of the Senate.
(q) (o) Two members of the Senate, appointed by the president of the Senate.
(r) (p) Two representatives of high-performing community early childhood
care and education networks, appointed by the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education upon recommendation of the state superintendent of education.
(s) (q) One representative of a nonpublic school participating in a publicly
funded early childhood care and education program, appointed by the State Board
of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(t) (r) A member appointed by the American Academy of Pediatrics,
Louisiana Chapter.
(u) One person with professional expertise in the operations of a family care
center, appointed by the governor. (s) One representative of a family child care
provider that is Child Care Assistance Program-certified with academic approval,
appointed by the state superintendent of education.
(v) (t) One early care and education researcher from a public postsecondary
education institution, appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives.
(w) (u) One representative from either a Type I or Type II early learning
center, appointed by the president of the Senate.
(x) (v) One representative of maternal, infant, and early childhood home
visitation programs within the Bureau of Family Health, appointed by the secretary
of the Louisiana Department of Health.
(y) (w) One representative of the Early Steps program within the Bureau of
Family Health, appointed by the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health.
Page 3 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1146 ENROLLED
(z) (x) One representative of early childhood programs within the state
Department of Education, appointed by the state superintendent of education.
(aa) (y) One representative The director of the Louisiana Head Start
Collaboration Office, appointed by the state superintendent of education.
(bb) (z) One representative of the special education programs within the state
Department of Education, appointed by the state superintendent of education.
(cc) (aa) A staff member of the Board of Regents, appointed by the Board of
Regents.
(dd) (bb) The secretary of Louisiana Works, or his designee.
(ee) (cc) The secretary of Louisiana Economic Development, or his designee.
(ff) (dd) The secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services,
or his designee.
(gg) (ee) One professional with expertise in the socioemotional development
and well-being of children from birth through age four, appointed by the governor.
(hh) (ff) One early intervention researcher from a Louisiana public
postsecondary education institution, appointed by the Board of Regents.
(ii) (gg) One early childhood education researcher from a Louisiana public
postsecondary education institution, appointed by the Board of Regents.
(jj) (hh) One member of the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education, appointed by the president of the board.
(kk) (ii) One early childhood development and education specialist,
appointed by the president of the Center for Development Literacy and Learning.
(ll) (jj) One member of the Louisiana Educational Television Authority,
appointed by the chairman of the authority.
(mm) (kk) One representative of a nongovernmental economic development
organization, appointed by the chief executive officer of the Committee of 100 for
Economic Development, Inc. Leaders for a Better Louisiana.
(nn) (ll) One representative of a child advocacy organization, appointed by
the chief executive director officer of the Louisiana Policy Institute for Children.
Page 4 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1146 ENROLLED
(oo) (mm) The president and chief executive officer of the Louisiana
Association of Business and Industry, or his designee.
(pp) (nn) The executive director One child care provider, appointed by the
board of directors of the Child Care Association of Louisiana, or his designee.
(oo) One representative of a Type III early learning center, selected by the
state superintendent of education.
(pp) One representative of a Type II early learning center, selected by the
state superintendent of education.
(qq) One representative of a Head Start program, which shall be operated by
a nonlocal education agency and selected by the state superintendent of education
from a list of three persons nominated by the Louisiana Head Start Association.
(rr) One representative of local education agencies operating publicly funded
early childhood programs other than Head Start, selected by the state board.
(ss) One representative from a child care resource and referral agency,
appointed by the state board.
(tt) One professional or faculty member having child development or early
childhood education expertise from a Louisiana postsecondary education institution,
selected by the commissioner of higher education.
(uu) One parent of a child currently enrolled in a publicly funded early
learning center or prekindergarten program, selected by the state board.
(2) The commission shall include nonvoting ex officio members who may
advise and contribute to discussions pertaining to early childhood care and education,
including but not limited to the following:
(a) The chairmen of the House Committee on Education, Senate Committee
on Education, House Committee on Health and Welfare, and Senate Committee on
Health and Welfare, or their designees.
(b) The director of the Maternal and Child Health Program at the Louisiana
Department of Health.
(c) The director of the Child and Adult Care Food Program at the
Department of Education.
Page 5 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1146 ENROLLED
(d) The Louisiana State Fire Marshal, or his designee.
(e) A representative from the office of sanitarian services at the Louisiana
Department of Health.
(f) A representative from the Louisiana State Police Bureau of Criminal
Identification and Information.
(3) A vacancy in the membership of the commission shall be filled in the
same manner as the original appointment.
(3) (4) The chairman of the House Committee on Education and chairman
of the Senate Committee on Education, acting jointly, shall select two members to
serve as co-chairmen of the commission voting members of the commission shall
elect a chair or provide for co-chairs if deemed necessary to provide for effective
governance.
(4) (5) The members of the commission shall serve without compensation,
unless otherwise provided by law.
(5) (6) Members shall serve a term of four years from the date of
appointment. However, the term of a member appointed by an elected official shall
not extend beyond the term of the appointing authority.
* * *
E.(1) The commission shall study and make recommendations relative to
establishing a statewide vision and framework for the future of early childhood care
and education in Louisiana. When conducting analysis and making
recommendations relative to a vision and framework, the commission shall do all of
the following:
(1) (a) Gather and analyze data relative to the current availability, quality,
and cost of early childhood care and education throughout the state for children from
birth through age four, determine needs and priorities, and develop a plan focused
on family access, affordability, and quality.
(2) (b) Consider research, local coordination currently established in
Louisiana including current high-performing community networks, and related work
done in other states to determine best practices for the purpose of informing and
Page 6 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1146 ENROLLED
fostering the continued development of local governing entities that coordinate
across programs and providers in order to meet family needs, drive quality
improvement, maximize financial resources, and support children from birth through
age four and their families.
(3) (c) Determine a sustainable infrastructure to ensure quality programs
across providers. Such infrastructure shall include workforce and professional
development, monitoring and assessment, coordinated enrollment, and data-informed
decisionmaking.
(4) (d) Identify opportunities for collaboration and coordination among and
inefficiencies across governance structures of programs and agencies responsible for
development of children from birth through age four, including state agencies, local
community networks, and publicly funded programs.
(5) (e) Define a timeframe for achieving the vision and determine
benchmarks for the intervening years.
(6) (f) Determine the amount of funding needed to achieve affordable access
to quality care and education for all children from birth through age four and
recommend policies that prioritize the allocation of future funding.
(7) (g) Gather and analyze data, laws, and policy in Louisiana and other
states where children are in the care of family child care providers and consider and
make recommendations relative to the incorporation of such providers into the early
childhood care and education network.
F. (2) Not later than ninety days following the end of each fiscal year, the
commission shall provide a report of its findings and recommendations and the status
of the implementation of its recommendations to the governor, the members of the
legislature, the state superintendent of education, and the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education. The report shall include without limitation policy
recommendations of the commission, the status of the implementation of its
recommendations, and findings of the commission concerning system performance
and progress toward statewide goals.
Page 7 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1146 ENROLLED
G. F.(1) The commission shall provide input and guidance to the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education and the state Department of
Education on matters pertaining to the development and implementation of rules,
regulations, bulletins, policies, or standards related to all early care and education
programs, including early learning centers, enrollment in early learning centers, the
Cecil J. Picard LA 4 Early Childhood Program, the Child Care and Development
Fund Block Grant, the Child Care Assistance Program, Early Head Start, and Head
Start.
(2) Prior to its submission to the United States Department of Health and
Human Services, the state Department of Education shall consult and provide a draft
of the state plan for the Child Care and Development Fund and its budget, and any
amendments to the state plan including budget revisions, and provide an opportunity
for the commission to make recommendations. Recommendations made by the
commission shall be reported to the state board.
(3) Prior to consideration by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education of any rule or standard related to early learning centers, enrollment in
early learning centers, the Cecil J. Picard LA 4 Early Childhood Program, the Child
Care and Development Fund Block Grant, or the Child Care Assistance Program, the
state Department of Education shall consult with and provide a draft of the proposed
rules to the commission and provide an opportunity for the commission to make
recommendations. Recommendations made by the commission shall be reported to
the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education prior to their adoption. The
provisions of this Paragraph shall not apply to the adoption of emergency rules.
However, the state Department of Education shall notify the commission of any
meetings of the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education at which
emergency rules pertaining to matters described in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection
will be considered. Such notification shall be given at the same time that public
notice of the meeting is given and shall include a draft of the proposed emergency
rule.
Page 8 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1146 ENROLLED
G.(1) The commission shall meet at least two times per year quarterly, with
the meetings to be called by the chair or the state superintendent as needed. At each
meeting, the state Department of Education shall provide updates on how the
commission's recommendations are being implemented. The commission shall make
any further recommendations it deems necessary to advance the vision and goals
established pursuant to Subsection E of this Section.
(2) Members of the commission may attend and participate in a meeting via
electronic means in accordance with R.S. 42:17.2.
* * *
I. The commission may establish such work groups as the commission
deems necessary and appropriate to carry out its duties and responsibilities, including
work groups focusing on matters that include but are not limited to an early
childhood education funding formula, early childhood education workforce stability,
early childhood education regulatory implementation, and an early childhood
education statewide vision and framework. Work groups shall meet at least twice
per year, and members of work groups may attend and participate in a meeting via
electronic means in accordance with R.S. 42:17.2.
J. The state Department of Education shall provide quarterly reports to the
commission on the implementation and progress, activities, and status of the Early
Childhood Care and Education Network.
K. The state Department of Education shall provide the commission with
reports not less than annually of the following information, provided that data is
available, pursuant to a schedule agreed upon by the chair and the state
superintendent of education:
(1) A description of each publicly funded early care and education program,
including the eligibility criteria, the program requirements, average number of hours
and days of the program, and the amount of total funding and source of funding for
each program. The description shall also include a specific description of the fee
structure for the Child Care Assistance Program.
Page 9 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1146 ENROLLED
(2) The number of children served in each publicly funded early childhood
care and education program in Louisiana, broken down by the age of the child and
amount of public funding per child per program.
(3) The number of early learning centers by each licensing type and at each
quality level as determined by the accountability system then in place, and the
number of children served at each age in each type at each quality level.
(4) A description of the training and support provided to each program and
the amount of funding for this by program and source of funds.
(5) A description of unmet family demand for early care and education in
Louisiana.
(6) A description of the goals for the upcoming fiscal year for early care and
education in Louisiana, including outcome indicators that will be used to measure
progress, and a description of the progress made in achieving the previous year's
goals.
(7) A description and results of any evaluations of the early care and
education programs in the state.
(8) A description of the early care and education workforce, including an
analysis of the status of the current early care and education workforce, including
demographics, certifications and education levels, participation and level on any
professional development ladder, and the participation in any teacher tax credits.
The description shall also include information about salaries and benefits, and a
comparison of these to similarly qualified employees in other but related fields, and
an analysis of the workforce capacity necessary to meet the state's early care and
education needs.
L. Any reports provided by the state Department of Education to the
commission and any commission recommendations shall be included in meeting
minutes.
M.(1) The commission is hereby designated as the State Advisory Council
on Early Childhood Education and Care for children from birth to school entry
Page 10 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1146 ENROLLED
pursuant to Section 642B(b)(1)(A)(i) of the Head Start Act (42 U.S.C.
9837b(b)(1)(A)(i)).
(2) The state superintendent of education or his designee shall serve as the
coordinator of the commission's activities in its capacity as the State Advisory
Council pursuant to Section 642B(b)(1)(A)(ii) of the Head Start Act (42 U.S.C.
9837b(b)(1)(A)(ii)).
(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to limit the authority of the
commission further than which is otherwise provided by this Section or to expand
the authority of the commission further than which is otherwise authorized by this
Section and applicable federal law.
Section 3. R.S. 17:407.51 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 4. Each action, recommendation, or report in progress on the effective date
of this Act pursuant to R.S. 17:407.51 shall continue without interruption, all in accordance
with the corresponding provisions of R.S. 17:407.101 as provided in this Act.
Section 5. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 11 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.